Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 8 Eggs

Cross references.

Imposition of penalty authorized in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

Regulation by Commissioner of Agriculture of business of hatchery operators and dealers, T. 4, C. 7.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Labeling, Inspection, Violations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of
Agriculture, Egg Inspector, Chapter 40-3-1.

Egg Processing Plants, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Egg Inspection, Chapter 40-3-2.

Egg Breaking Room Sanitation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Egg Inspection, Chapter 40-3-3.

26-2-260.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Cold storage” means protected storage in a refrigerated place.

“Commerce” means interstate, foreign, or intrastate commerce.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

“Egg” means the shell egg of the domesticated chicken, turkey, duck, goose, or guinea.

“Egg handler” means any person who engages in any business in commerce which involves buying or selling any eggs, as a poultry producer or otherwise, processing any egg products, or otherwise using any eggs in the preparation of human food.

“Egg product” means any dried, frozen, or liquid eggs, with or without added ingredients, except products which contain eggs only in a relatively small proportion or which historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the egg food industry.

“Quality” means the inherent properties of any product which determine its relative degree of excellence.

“Wholesaler” means any person, firm, corporation, association, dealer, or broker selling or offering for sale, in or into this state, more than five cases of eggs in any one week.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-261.
Classification of eggs.

Within the intent and purpose of this article, eggs classified as:

Storage eggs shall be construed to mean eggs which have been in cold storage for a period of 31 days or longer; and

Fresh eggs shall be construed to mean eggs which have been held in cold storage not longer than 30 days from the date they were packed.

Each container of eggs must be labeled to show size or weight class and standard of quality.

All eggs sold or offered for sale by dealers, as designated by this article, shall be graded as to net weight and standards of quality.

The size or weight classes shall be:

Click to view

The weight tolerance, per dozen, where eggs are sold at retail, shall be not more than two eggs of the minimum net weight for individual eggs at the rate per dozen. Not more than 5 percent tolerance of the minimum net weight for individual eggs at the rate per dozen shall be allowed where eggs are sold in wholesale lots.

The quality classifications for individual eggs shall be:

Grade AA:

Shell: clean, unbroken, practically normal.

Air cell: one-eighth inch or less in depth, unlimited movement, and free or bubbly.

Yolk: outline slightly defined, practically free from defects.

White: firm, clear.

Grade A:

Shell: clean, unbroken, practically normal.

Air cell: three-sixteenths inch or less in depth, unlimited movement, and free or bubbly.

Yolk: outline fairly well defined, practically free from defects.

White: reasonably firm, clear.

Grade B:

Shell: clean to slightly stained (but not more than one thirty-second of surface if localized or one-sixteenth of surface if scattered), unbroken, abnormal.

Air cell: over three-sixteenths inch in depth, unlimited movement, and free or bubbly.

Yolk: outline plainly visible, enlarged and flattened, clearly visible germ development but no blood, other serious defects.

White: weak and watery, small blood and meat spots present (but not more than one-eighth inch in diameter aggregate).

The U.S. Standards, Grades, and Weight Classes for Shell Eggs, Part 56, Subpart C, Paragraphs 56,216 and 56,217 established pursuant to the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 are adopted by reference.

All of the classifications indicated in this Code section shall be determined by candling.

Size or Weight Classes Minimum Net Wt. Per Doz. (Oz.) Min. Net Wt.For Indv. Eggs at Rate Per Doz. (Oz.) Min. Net Wt. Per 30 Doz. (Lbs.) Jumbo 30 29 56 Extra Large 27 26 50 1/2 Large 24 23 45 MediumSS 21 20 39 1/2 Small 18 17 34 Pee Wee 15 14 28

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 1; Ga. L. 1937, p. 639, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 49, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “three-sixteenths” was substituted for “three-sixteenth” in divisions (c)(2)(B)(ii) and (c)(2)(C)(ii), and “one thirty-second” was substituted for “one-thirtysecond” in division (c)(2)(C)(i).

26-2-262.
Registration of entities dealing in eggs.

All wholesalers, commission merchants, brokers, retailers, and dealers of any kind or character who desire to sell or offer eggs for sale in this state shall first file with the Commissioner of Agriculture, upon forms furnished by the Commissioner, the name of the firm or person desiring to offer eggs for sale either by themselves or by their agent, together with the address of said firm or person and the type or kind of eggs to be offered for sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-263.
License required for wholesaler or egg handler; grounds for suspension or revocation; transferability; exemption.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in business as a wholesaler or as an egg handler without first obtaining a license from the Commissioner. No license issued under this article shall be suspended or revoked except for health and sanitation reasons or violations of this article and until the licensee to be affected shall be provided with reasonable notice thereof and an opportunity for hearing, as provided under Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Licenses issued under this article shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable with respect to persons or location. There shall be no fee for such license.

Food sales establishments licensed under Article 2 of this chapter, known as the “Georgia Food Act,” and shell egg handlers registered under the United States Department of Agriculture shell egg surveillance inspection program shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 5; Ga. L. 1958, p. 27, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 26.

26-2-264.
Sales by entities dealing in eggs; exemption of producers from taxation and licensing.

It shall be unlawful for any wholesaler, commission merchant, broker, retailer, or dealer of eggs, either by himself or by his agent, to offer for sale in this state any eggs if this article has not been complied with, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to repeal the exemption given the producer in the sale of commodities of his own production from taxation and licensing by existing laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-265.
Dealer’s invoices of sales to be furnished to Department of Agriculture on request; exception for sales to consumers.

All dealers, wholesale or retail, shall be required to furnish to the Department of Agriculture upon request a copy of the invoice of each sale of eggs, the copy of invoice to show the person or firm to whom the sale was made, the address of such person or firm, and the kind and quantity involved in such sale, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to require the filing of a copy of the invoice of a sale to a consumer.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 8; Code 1981, §

26-2-266

; Code 1981, §

26-2-265

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-266.
Inspectors and assistants; confiscation and destruction of eggs found unfit for human consumption.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall instruct the agricultural sanitarians and agricultural inspectors of the Department of Agriculture to carry out this article. The Commissioner is authorized in his discretion to select and appoint such other additional assistants as in his judgment he deems necessary to enforce this article.

All such employees of the Department of Agriculture are authorized to confiscate and destroy all eggs found to be unfit for human consumption.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 10; Code 1981, §

26-2-267

; Code 1981, §

26-2-266

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-267.
Promulgation of rules, regulations, grades, and standards; powers of inspectors.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to promulgate, issue, and set up such additional rules, regulations, grades, standards, or otherwise as in his judgment are necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this article. The sanitarians and inspectors authorized in Code Section 26-2-266 are authorized to exercise all the authority, powers, and privileges now delegated to the duly authorized food inspectors of the Department of Agriculture by existing law.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 11; Code 1981, §

26-2-268

; Code 1981, §

26-2-267

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-268.
Information labels affixed to cases of eggs.

At the time of packing and candling of each case of eggs, the producer or dealer shall affix a label not less than two inches by four inches or not less than eight square inches on one end of each case and on this label shall be legibly printed or stamped, in letters not less than one-fourth of an inch in size, the date when the eggs were packed and candled or the expiration date, which shall not exceed 45 days from the date packed; the size and grade of the eggs; and either the name and address of the packer or the U.S.D.A. assigned plant number or a state approved plant identification code. The name of the state of origin may be given. When eggs are sold in cartons, the cartons must show the date packed or the expiration date, which shall not exceed 45 days from the date packed, and the grade and size, together with either the name and address of the packer or the U.S.D.A. assigned plant number or a state approved plant identification code. The state of origin may also be given.

Abbreviations of any words in the classification or in designating the grade and size shall not be permitted. The information pertaining to the grade and size shall be shown in legible letters not less than one-fourth of an inch in size. The information pertaining to the name and address of the packer or the U.S.D.A. assigned plant number or a state approved plant identification code and the date packed or expiration date shall be legibly given. All wording on egg cases and egg cartons must be in the English language and must have prior approval from the Georgia Department of Agriculture before using.

Words or phrases tending to becloud or nullify the proper classification of eggs shall not be permitted. Each word of the classification, including the name of the state of origin, shall appear in the same size type and color in any printed advertisement. Abbreviations of any word in the classification or in designating the size and grade to which eggs belong shall not be permitted. Every person advertising eggs for sale, at retail or wholesale, in newspapers, by window displays, or otherwise shall set forth in the advertisement the classification as to size and grade of the eggs offered for sale. The classification shall be set forth in letters equal in size to those advertising the eggs for sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 2; Ga. L. 1937, p. 639, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 27, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 690, § 1; Code 1981, §

26-2-269

; Code 1981, §

26-2-268

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 223, § 1.

Cross references.

False advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

26-2-269.
Placard to be displayed; contents.

All eggs offered for sale at retail shall be properly classified in accordance with the following specifications:

A heavy cardboard or placard, not less than eight by eleven inches, shall be conspicuously displayed at all times on or over each receptacle containing eggs offered for sale, setting forth in letters not less than one inch in height, plainly and legibly, the classification as to quality and weight;

The name of the state of origin of eggs may appear on the placard;

The placard shall not be required when eggs are packed in properly labeled cartons. The eggs therein shall be required to come up to the standard as placarded; and

Restaurants, hotels, or other eating places shall be required to display a placard where it can be easily seen by customers or, in lieu thereof, to place this information on the menu.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 639, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 49, § 4; Ga. L. 1958, p. 27, § 2; Code 1981, §

26-2-270

; Code 1981, §

26-2-269

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-270.
Reciprocal marketing agreement to vary labeling requirements.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to enter into reciprocal marketing agreements with other states to vary the labeling requirements provided in this article. Such agreements shall not vary the standards of quality and weights provided in this article, it being the purpose and intent of this Code section to promote and encourage interstate marketing of eggs and to authorize variations of labeling as required in this article where such variations will promote and encourage the marketing of eggs.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 27, § 3; Code 1981, §

26-2-271

; Code 1981, §

26-2-270

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-271.
“Withhold From Sale Orders”; cost of inspection and release.

Inspectors or sanitarians of the Department of Agriculture, upon determining that this article or the rules and regulations promulgated for its enforcement are being violated, may put “Withhold From Sale Orders” on all eggs being sold or offered for sale in violation of this article or the regulations thereof and shall report the circumstances to the Commissioner of Agriculture for his action.

Eggs upon which “Withhold From Sale Orders” have been issued shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of until such “Withhold From Sale Orders” have been canceled by the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents. The cost of the inspection and release shall be paid by the offender.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 639, § 3; Code 1981, §

26-2-272

; Code 1981, §

26-2-271

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-272.
Licensing of candlers and graders of eggs; promulgation of rules and regulations regarding qualifications; temporary work without license.

Each candler and grader of eggs offered for sale shall obtain a license from the Department of Agriculture at no cost, after demonstrating to the satisfaction of the department his capability and qualifications as an egg candler and grader. The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to establish by rule and regulation the minimum qualifications for egg candlers and graders. With the approval of the Commissioner, any person may candle and grade eggs not to exceed 14 days, pending licensing by the department, provided that during this period the employer of such temporary candler and grader shall be accountable for the actions of such candler and grader while acting in such capacity.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 21, § 2; Code 1981, §

26-2-273

; Code 1981, §

26-2-272

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

26-2-273.
Refrigeration and other handling requirements.

All shell egg producers shall refrigerate eggs upon gathering such eggs. Eggs shall be graded and packed within a reasonable period of time from gathering.

After washing, processing, and packaging, eggs shall be transported, stored, and displayed at an ambient temperature not to exceed 45 degrees Fahrenheit until sold at retail or used by any commercial establishment or public institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-273

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “Fahrenheit” was substituted for “Farenheit” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 26-2-273 as present Code Section 26-2-272, and enacted the present Code Section 26-2-273.

26-2-274.
Penalty; duty of prosecuting attorneys to prosecute violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates any provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of the appropriate court to prosecute all persons charged with the violation of this article as soon as the evidence has been transmitted to them by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 364, § 12; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1115, § 1.